Illinois, session 104th, HB231.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Predatory Loan Prevention Act is amended by 5changing Section 15-1-1 as follows: 6    (815 ILCS 123/15-1-1)7    Sec. 15-1-1. Short title. This Article may be cited as the 8the Predatory Loan Prevention Act. References in this Article 9to "this Act" mean this Article.10(Source: P.A. 101-658, eff. 3-23-21; 102-687, eff. 12-17-21.)